Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1071
Public hearing; commission; duties.

The commission shall hold a public hearing annually to determine the amount of revenue necessary to carry out the 911 Service System Act. After the hearing, the commission shall determine the amount of money to be deposited in the 911 Service System Fund for the following year and shall set the surcharge subject to the limitation in section 86-1070.

Laws 2001, LB 585, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2203;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 259;

Laws 2016, LB938, § 32;

Laws 2018, LB993, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-458;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 53.